Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 2. Uniform Foreign Money-Judgments Recognition Act.

Collateral references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d, Executions and Enforcement of Judgments, §§ 792-798.

50 C.J.S., Judgments, § 1355 et seq.

Inclusion in domestic judgment or record, in action upon a judgment of a sister state, of findings respecting the cause of action, on which judgment in the sister state was rendered, 10 ALR2d 435.

Decree for alimony rendered in another country (or domestic decree based thereon) as subject to enforcement by equitable remedies or by contempt proceedings, 18 ALR2d 862.

Conflict of laws as to time limitations governing action on foreign judgment, 36 ALR2d 567.

Obtaining cognovit instrument by fraud as affecting validity and enforceability of judgment entered in sister state under a warrant of attorney to confess judgment, 39 ALR2d 1250.

Policy of forum as to agreement for attorneys’ fees as affecting foreign judgment enforcing provision valid in state of its execution or performance, 54 ALR2d 1053.

Fraud as defense to action on judgment of sister state, 55 ALR2d 673.

Identification of parties in action on foreign judgment, 60 ALR2d 1024.

Judgment subject to appeal as entitled to full faith and credit, 2 ALR3d 1384.

Requirement of full faith and credit to foreign judgment for punitive damages, 44 ALR3d 960.

Construction and application of Uniform Foreign Money-Judgments Recognition Act, 100 ALR3d 792.

Sec. 09.30.100.
Applicability.

AS

09.30.100

—

09.30.180

apply to any foreign judgment that is final and conclusive and enforceable where rendered even though an appeal is pending or it is subject to appeal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1972)

Sec. 09.30.110.
Recognition and enforcement.

Except as provided in AS

09.30.120

, a foreign judgment meeting the requirements of AS

09.30.100

is conclusive between the parties to the extent that it grants or denies recovery of a sum of money. The foreign judgment is enforceable in the same manner as the judgment of a sister state which is entitled to full faith and credit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1972)

Sec. 09.30.120.
Grounds for nonrecognition.

A foreign judgment is not conclusive if

the judgment was rendered under a system that does not provide impartial tribunals or procedures compatible with the requirements of due process of law;

the foreign court did not have personal jurisdiction over the defendant; or

the foreign court did not have jurisdiction over the subject matter.

A foreign judgment need not be recognized if

the defendant in the proceedings in the foreign court did not receive notice of the proceedings in sufficient time to enable the defendant to defend;

the judgment was obtained by fraud;

the cause of action on which the judgment is based is repugnant to the public policy of this state;

the judgment conflicts with another final and conclusive judgment;

the proceeding in the foreign court was contrary to an agreement between the parties under which the dispute in question was to be settled otherwise than by proceedings in that court; or

in the case of jurisdiction based only on personal service, the foreign court was a seriously inconvenient forum for the trial of the action.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1972)

Sec. 09.30.130.
Personal jurisdiction.

The foreign judgment may not be refused recognition for lack of personal jurisdiction if

the defendant was served personally in the foreign state;

the defendant voluntarily appeared in the proceedings, other than for the purpose of protecting property seized or threatened with seizure in the proceedings or of contesting the jurisdiction of the court over the defendant;

the defendant, before the commencement of the proceedings, had agreed to submit to the jurisdiction of the foreign court with respect to the subject matter involved;

the defendant was domiciled in the foreign state when the proceedings were instituted, or, being a body corporate, had its principal place of business, was incorporated, or had otherwise acquired corporate status, in the foreign state;

the defendant had a business office in the foreign state and the proceedings in the foreign court involved a cause of action arising out of business done by the defendant through that office in the foreign state; or

the defendant operated a motor vehicle or airplane in the foreign state and the proceedings involved a cause of action arising out of that operation.

The courts of this state may recognize other bases of jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1972)

Sec. 09.30.140.
Stay in case of appeal.

If the defendant satisfies the court either that an appeal is pending or that the defendant is entitled and intends to appeal from the foreign judgment, the court may stay the proceedings until the appeal has been determined or until the expiration of a period of time sufficient to enable the defendant to prosecute the appeal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1972)

Sec. 09.30.150.
Saving clause.

AS

09.30.100

—

09.30.180

do not prevent the recognition of a foreign judgment in situations not covered by AS

09.30.100

—

09.30.180

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1972)

Sec. 09.30.160.
Construction.

AS

09.30.100

—

09.30.180

shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states that enact the Uniform Foreign Money-Judgments Recognition Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1972)

Sec. 09.30.170.
Definitions.

In AS

09.30.100

—

09.30.180

“foreign judgment” means a judgment of a foreign state granting or denying recovery of a sum of money other than a judgment for taxes, a fine or other penalty, or a judgment for support in matrimonial or family matters;

“foreign state” means a governmental unit other than the United States, or a state, district, commonwealth, territory including trust territory, or insular possession thereof.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1972; am § 9 ch 50 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section was reorganized in 2006 to place the defined terms in alphabetical order.

Legislative history reports. —

For an analysis of the 1989 amendment to this section, see Senate-House Joint Journal Supplement No. 10, May 5, 1989, p. 4, under “Sec. 9.”

Sec. 09.30.180.
Short title.

AS

09.30.100

—

09.30.180

may be cited as the Uniform Foreign Money-Judgments Recognition Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 1972)